Oklahoma, session 2025, SB945.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1685, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1685. A. Any person who shall knowingly deprive any
animal in subjugation or captivity, whether wild or tame, and
whether belonging to the person or to another, of necessary food,
drink, shelter, or veterinary care; or who shall cause, procure, or
permit any such animal to be deprived by another shall be guilty,
upon conviction, of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the
county jail for a term not to exceed one (1) year, by a fine not
more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or by both such
imprisonment and fine. Any animal so maltreated shall be considered
a neglected animal.
B. Any person who shall willfully or maliciously torture
knowingly, destroy, or kill, or cruelly beat or injure, maim, or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB945 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

muti late any animal in subjugation or captivity, whether wild or
tame, and whether belonging to the person or to another, or deprive
any such animal of necessary food, drink, shelter, or veterinary
care to prevent suffering; or who shall cause, procure, or permit
any such animal to be so tortured, destroyed, or killed, or cruelly
beaten or injured, maimed, or mutilated, or deprived of necessary
food, drink, shelter, or veterinary care to prevent suffering; or
who shall willfully set on foot, instigate, engage in, or in any way
further any act of cruelty to any animal, or any act tending to
produce such cruelty, shall be guilty, upon conviction, of a felony
and shall be punished punishable by imprisonment in the State
Penitentiary custody of the Department of Corrections for a term not
exceeding to exceed five (5) years, or by imprisonment in the county
jail for a term not to exceed exceeding one (1) year, or by a fine
not exceeding more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or by
both such imprisonment and fine. Any animal so maltreated or abused
shall be considered an abused or neglected animal.
C. Any person providing commercial services for animals,
including, but not limited to, veterinary care, grooming services,
or boarding, who shall willfully or maliciously destroy, kill, beat,
injure, maim, or mutilate an animal or pet in his or her care,
shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a felony punishable by
imprisonment in the Department of Corrections for a term not to

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB945 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

exce ed ten (10) years, a fine not more than Seven Thousand Dollars
($7,000.00), or by both such imprisonment and fine.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON PUBLIC SAFETY
February 19, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED




















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB945 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)